Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 7.105.010 and 2024 c 298 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable adult without the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health care.(2) "Abuse," for the purposes of a vulnerable adult protection order, means intentional, willful, or reckless action or inaction that inflicts injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult. In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. "Abuse" includes sexual abuse, mental abuse, physical abuse, personal exploitation, and improper use of restraint against a vulnerable adult, which have the following meanings:(a) "Improper use of restraint" means the inappropriate use of chemical, physical, or mechanical restraints for convenience or discipline, or in a manner that: (i) Is inconsistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW; (ii) is not medically authorized; or (iii) otherwise constitutes abuse under this section.(b) "Mental abuse" means an intentional, willful, or reckless verbal or nonverbal action that threatens, humiliates, harasses, coerces, intimidates, isolates, unreasonably confines, or punishes a vulnerable adult. "Mental abuse" may include ridiculing, yelling, swearing, or withholding or tampering with prescribed medications or their dosage.(c) "Personal exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable adult to perform services for the benefit of another.(d) "Physical abuse" means the intentional, willful, or reckless action of inflicting bodily injury or physical mistreatment. "Physical abuse" includes, but is not limited to, striking with or without an object, slapping, pinching, strangulation, suffocation, kicking, shoving, or prodding.(e) "Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual conduct including, but not limited to, unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, molestation, indecent liberties, sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing or recording, voyeurism, indecent exposure, and sexual harassment. "Sexual abuse" also includes any sexual conduct between a staff person, who is not also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, whether or not the sexual conduct is consensual.(3) "Chemical restraint" means the administration of any drug to manage a vulnerable adult's behavior in a way that reduces the safety risk to the vulnerable adult or others, has the temporary effect of restricting the vulnerable adult's freedom of movement, and is not standard treatment for the vulnerable adult's medical or psychiatric condition.(4)(a) "Coercive control" means a pattern of behavior that is used to cause another to suffer physical, emotional, or psychological harm, and in purpose or effect unreasonably interferes with a person's free will and personal liberty. In determining whether the interference is unreasonable, the court shall consider the context and impact of the pattern of behavior from the perspective of a similarly situated person. Examples of coercive control include, but are not limited to, engaging in any of the following:(i) Intimidation or controlling or compelling conduct by:(A) Damaging, destroying, or threatening to damage or destroy, or forcing the other party to relinquish, goods, property, or items of special value;(B) Using technology to threaten, humiliate, harass, stalk, intimidate, exert undue influence over, or abuse the other party, including by engaging in cyberstalking, monitoring, surveillance, impersonation, manipulation of electronic media, or distribution of or threats to distribute actual or fabricated intimate images;(C) Carrying, exhibiting, displaying, drawing, or threatening to use, any firearm or any other weapon apparently capable of producing bodily harm, in a manner, under circumstances, and at a time and place that either manifests an intent to intimidate the other party or that warrants alarm by the other party for their safety or the safety of other persons;(D) Driving recklessly with the other party or minor children in the vehicle;(E) Communicating, directly or indirectly, the intent to:(I) Harm the other party's children, family members, friends, or pets, including by use of physical forms of violence;(II) Harm the other party's career;(III) Attempt suicide or other acts of self-harm; or(IV) Contact local or federal agencies based on actual or suspected immigration status;(F) Exerting control over the other party's identity documents;(G) Making, or threatening to make, private information public, including the other party's sexual orientation or gender identity, medical or behavioral health information, or other confidential information that jeopardizes safety; or(H) Engaging in sexual or reproductive coercion;(ii) Causing dependence, confinement, or isolation of the other party from friends, relatives, or other sources of support, including schooling and employment, or subjecting the other party to physical confinement or restraint;(iii) Depriving the other party of basic necessities or committing other forms of financial exploitation;(iv) Controlling, exerting undue influence over, interfering with, regulating, or monitoring the other party's movements, communications, daily behavior, finances, economic resources, or employment, including but not limited to interference with or attempting to limit access to services for children of the other party, such as health care, medication, child care, or school-based extracurricular activities;(v) Engaging in vexatious litigation or abusive litigation as defined in RCW 26.51.020 against the other party to harass, coerce, or control the other party, to diminish or exhaust the other party's financial resources, or to compromise the other party's employment or housing; or(vi) Engaging in psychological aggression, including inflicting fear, humiliating, degrading, or punishing the other party.(b) "Coercive control" does not include protective actions taken by a party in good faith for the legitimate and lawful purpose of protecting themselves or children from the risk of harm posed by the other party.(5) "Commercial sexual exploitation" means commercial sexual abuse of a minor and sex trafficking.(6) "Consent" in the context of sexual acts means that at the time of sexual contact, there are actual words or conduct indicating freely given agreement to that sexual contact. Consent must be ongoing and may be revoked at any time. Conduct short of voluntary agreement does not constitute consent as a matter of law. Consent cannot be freely given when a person does not have capacity due to disability, intoxication, or age. Consent cannot be freely given when the other party has authority or control over the care or custody of a person incarcerated or detained.(7)(a) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct" includes any form of communication, contact, or conduct, including the sending of an electronic communication, but does not include constitutionally protected free speech. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of "course of conduct."(b) In determining whether the course of conduct serves any legitimate or lawful purpose, a court should consider whether:(i) Any current contact between the parties was initiated by the respondent only or was initiated by both parties;(ii) The respondent has been given clear notice that all further contact with the petitioner is unwanted;(iii) The respondent's course of conduct appears designed to alarm, annoy, or harass the petitioner;(iv) The respondent is acting pursuant to any statutory authority including, but not limited to, acts which are reasonably necessary to:(A) Protect property or liberty interests;(B) Enforce the law; or(C) Meet specific statutory duties or requirements;(v) The respondent's course of conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably interfering with the petitioner's privacy or the purpose or effect of creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive living environment for the petitioner; or(vi) Contact by the respondent with the petitioner or the petitioner's family has been limited in any manner by any previous court order.(8) "Court clerk" means court administrators in courts of limited jurisdiction and elected court clerks.(9) "Dating relationship" means a social relationship of a romantic nature. Factors that the court may consider in making this determination include: (a) The length of time the relationship has existed; (b) the nature of the relationship; and (c) the frequency of interaction between the parties.(10) "Domestic violence" means:(a) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or assault; nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; coercive control; unlawful harassment; or stalking of one intimate partner by another intimate partner; or(b) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the infliction of fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or assault; nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; coercive control; unlawful harassment; or stalking of one family or household member by another family or household member.(11) "Electronic monitoring" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.(12) "Essential personal effects" means those items necessary for a person's immediate health, welfare, and livelihood. "Essential personal effects" includes, but is not limited to, clothing, cribs, bedding, medications, personal hygiene items, cellular phones and other electronic devices, and documents, including immigration, health care, financial, travel, and identity documents.(13) "Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, assisted living facilities; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes; chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; or any other facility licensed or certified by the department of social and health services.(14) "Family or household members" means: (a) Persons related by blood, marriage, domestic partnership, or adoption; (b) persons who currently or formerly resided together; (c) persons who have a biological or legal parent-child relationship, including stepparents and stepchildren and grandparents and grandchildren, or a parent's intimate partner and children; and (d) a person who is acting or has acted as a legal guardian.(15) "Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of, control over, or withholding of, the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any person or entity for any person's or entity's profit or advantage other than for the vulnerable adult's profit or advantage. "Financial exploitation" includes, but is not limited to:(a) The use of deception, intimidation, or undue influence by a person or entity in a position of trust and confidence with a vulnerable adult to obtain or use the property, income, resources, government benefits, health insurance benefits, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult;(b) The breach of a fiduciary duty, including, but not limited to, the misuse of a power of attorney, trust, or a guardianship or conservatorship appointment, that results in the unauthorized appropriation, sale, or transfer of the property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult for the benefit of a person or entity other than the vulnerable adult; or(c) Obtaining or using a vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds without lawful authority, by a person or entity who knows or clearly should know that the vulnerable adult lacks the capacity to consent to the release or use of the vulnerable adult's property, income, resources, or trust funds.(16) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes. "Firearm" also includes parts that can be assembled to make a firearm.(17) "Full hearing" means a hearing where the court determines whether to issue a full protection order.(18) "Full protection order" means a protection order that is issued by the court after notice to the respondent and where the parties had the opportunity for a full hearing by the court. "Full protection order" includes a protection order entered by the court by agreement of the parties to resolve the petition for a protection order without a full hearing.(19) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW or a state hospital defined in chapter 72.23 RCW and any employee, agent, officer, director, or independent contractor thereof.(20) "Ignition interlock device" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.215.(21) "Interested person" means:(a) For protection orders other than impaired driving protection orders, a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person is interested in the welfare of a vulnerable adult, that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary, and that the vulnerable adult is unable, due to incapacity, undue influence, or duress at the time the petition is filed, to protect his or her own interests; or(b) For impaired driving protection orders, a person who demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the person can provide credible testimony regarding the respondent's history of driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor and that the person has a good faith belief that the court's intervention is necessary.(((21)))(22) "Intimate partner" means: (a) Spouses or domestic partners; (b) former spouses or former domestic partners; (c) persons who have a child in common regardless of whether they have been married or have lived together at any time, unless the child is conceived through sexual assault; or (d) persons who have or have had a dating relationship where both persons are at least 13 years of age or older.(((22)))(23)(a) "Isolate" or "isolation" means to restrict a person's ability to communicate, visit, interact, or otherwise associate with persons of his or her choosing. Isolation may be evidenced by acts including, but not limited to:(i) Acts that prevent a person from sending, making, or receiving his or her personal mail, electronic communications, or telephone calls; or(ii) Acts that prevent or obstruct a person from meeting with others, such as telling a prospective visitor or caller that the person is not present or does not wish contact, where the statement is contrary to the express wishes of the person.(b) The term "isolate" or "isolation" may not be construed in a manner that prevents a guardian or limited guardian from performing his or her fiduciary obligations under chapter 11.92 RCW or prevents a hospital or facility from providing treatment consistent with the standard of care for delivery of health services.(((23)))(24) "Judicial day" means days of the week other than Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays.(((24)))(25) "Mechanical restraint" means any device attached or adjacent to a vulnerable adult's body that the vulnerable adult cannot easily remove that restricts freedom of movement or normal access to the vulnerable adult's body. "Mechanical restraint" does not include the use of devices, materials, or equipment that are (a) medically authorized, as required, and (b) used in a manner that is consistent with federal or state licensing or certification requirements for facilities, hospitals, or programs authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW.(((25)))(26) "Minor" means a person who is under 18 years of age.(((26)))(27) "Neglect" means: (a) A pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or entity with a duty of care that fails to provide the goods and services that maintain the physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that fails to avoid or prevent physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or omission by a person or entity with a duty of care that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's health, welfare, or safety including, but not limited to, conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100.(((27)))(28) "Nonconsensual" means a lack of freely given consent.(((28)))(29) "Nonphysical contact" includes, but is not limited to, written notes, mail, telephone calls, email, text messages, contact through social media applications, contact through other technologies, or contact through third parties.(((29)))(30) "Petitioner" means any named petitioner or any other person identified in the petition on whose behalf the petition is brought.(((30)))(31) "Physical restraint" means the application of physical force without the use of any device, for the purpose of restraining the free movement of a vulnerable adult's body. "Physical restraint" does not include (a) briefly holding, without undue force, a vulnerable adult in order to calm or comfort him or her, or (b) holding a vulnerable adult's hand to safely escort him or her from one area to another.(((31)))(32) "Possession" means having an item in one's custody or control. Possession may be either actual or constructive. Actual possession occurs when the item is in the actual physical custody of the person charged with possession. Constructive possession occurs when there is no actual physical possession, but there is dominion and control over the item.(((32)))(33) "Respondent" means the person who is identified as the respondent in a petition filed under this chapter.(((33)))(34) "Sexual conduct" means any of the following:(a) Any intentional or knowing touching or fondling of the genitals, anus, or breasts, directly or indirectly, including through clothing;(b) Any intentional or knowing display of the genitals, anus, or breasts for the purposes of arousal or sexual gratification of the respondent;(c) Any intentional or knowing touching or fondling of the genitals, anus, or breasts, directly or indirectly, including through clothing, that the petitioner is forced to perform by another person or the respondent;(d) Any forced display of the petitioner's genitals, anus, or breasts for the purposes of arousal or sexual gratification of the respondent or others;(e) Any intentional or knowing touching of the clothed or unclothed body of a child under the age of 16, if done for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the respondent or others; or(f) Any coerced or forced touching or fondling by a child under the age of 16, directly or indirectly, including through clothing, of the genitals, anus, or breasts of the respondent or others.(((34)))(35) "Sexual penetration" means any contact, however slight, between the sex organ or anus of one person by an object, the sex organ, mouth, or anus of another person, or any intrusion, however slight, of any part of the body of one person or of any animal or object into the sex organ or anus of another person including, but not limited to, cunnilingus, fellatio, or anal penetration. Evidence of emission of semen is not required to prove sexual penetration.(((35)))(36) "Stalking" means any of the following:(a) Any act of stalking as defined under RCW 9A.46.110;(b) Any act of cyber harassment as defined under RCW 9A.90.120; or(c) Any course of conduct involving repeated or continuing contacts, attempts to contact, monitoring, tracking, surveillance, keeping under observation, disrupting activities in a harassing manner, or following of another person that:(i) Would cause a reasonable person to feel intimidated, frightened, under duress, significantly disrupted, or threatened and that actually causes such a feeling;(ii) Serves no lawful purpose; and(iii) The respondent knows, or reasonably should know, threatens, frightens, or intimidates the person, even if the respondent did not intend to intimidate, frighten, or threaten the person.(((36)))(37) "Temporary protection order" means a protection order that is issued before the court has decided whether to issue a full protection order. "Temporary protection order" includes ex parte temporary protection orders, as well as temporary protection orders that are reissued by the court pending the completion of a full hearing to decide whether to issue a full protection order. An "ex parte temporary protection order" means a temporary protection order that is issued without prior notice to the respondent.(((37)))(38) "Unlawful harassment" means:(a) A knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person that seriously alarms, annoys, harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and that serves no legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, and must actually cause substantial emotional distress to the petitioner; or(b) A single act of violence or threat of violence directed at a specific person that seriously alarms, annoys, harasses, or is detrimental to such person, and that serves no legitimate or lawful purpose, which would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, and must actually cause substantial emotional distress to the petitioner. A single threat of violence must include: (i) A malicious and intentional threat as described in RCW 9A.36.080(1)(c); or (ii) the presence of a firearm or other weapon.(((38)))(39) "Vulnerable adult" includes a person:(a) Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself; or(b) Subject to a guardianship under RCW 11.130.265 or adult subject to conservatorship under RCW 11.130.360; or(c) Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or(d) Admitted to any facility; or(e) Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or(f) Receiving services from a person under contract with the department of social and health services to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW; or(g) Who self-directs his or her own care and receives services from a personal aide under chapter 74.39 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:The superior courts have jurisdiction over impaired driving protection order proceedings under this chapter. Additionally, district courts have limited jurisdiction over the issuance and enforcement of temporary impaired driving protection orders issued under section 9 of this act. The district court shall set the full hearing in superior court and transfer the case. If the notice and order are not served on the respondent in time for the full hearing, the issuing court has concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court to extend the temporary impaired driving protection order. The superior court to which the case is being transferred shall determine whether to grant any request for a continuance.Sec. 3. RCW 7.105.100 and 2024 c 298 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There exists an action known as a petition for a protection order. The following types of petitions for a protection order may be filed:(a) A petition for a domestic violence protection order, which must allege the existence of domestic violence committed against the petitioner or petitioners by an intimate partner or a family or household member. The petitioner may petition for relief on behalf of himself or herself and on behalf of family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults. A petition for a domestic violence protection order must specify whether the petitioner and the respondent are intimate partners or family or household members. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted or stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order or a stalking protection order.(b) A petition for a sexual assault protection order, which must allege the existence of nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or commercial sexual exploitation that was committed against the petitioner by the respondent. A petitioner who has been sexually assaulted by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a sexual assault protection order. A single incident of nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration is sufficient grounds for a petition for a sexual assault protection order. The petitioner may petition for a sexual assault protection order on behalf of:(i) Himself or herself;(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.(c) A petition for a stalking protection order, which must allege the existence of stalking committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. A petitioner who has been stalked by an intimate partner or a family or household member should, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence protection order, rather than a stalking protection order. The petitioner may petition for a stalking protection order on behalf of:(i) Himself or herself;(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.(d) A petition for a vulnerable adult protection order, which must allege that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, is a vulnerable adult and that the petitioner, or person on whose behalf the petition is brought, has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected, or is threatened with abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect, by the respondent.(e) A petition for an extreme risk protection order, which must allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing, accessing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm. The petition must also identify information the petitioner is able to provide about the firearms, such as the number, types, and locations of any firearms the petitioner believes to be in the respondent's current ownership, possession, custody, access, or control. A petition for an extreme risk protection order may be filed by (i) an intimate partner or a family or household member of the respondent; or (ii) a law enforcement agency.(f) A petition for an antiharassment protection order, which must allege the existence of unlawful harassment committed against the petitioner or petitioners by the respondent. If a petitioner is seeking relief based on domestic violence, nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or stalking, the petitioner may, but is not required to, seek a domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking protection order, rather than an antiharassment order. The petitioner may petition for an antiharassment protection order on behalf of:(i) Himself or herself;(ii) A minor child, where the petitioner is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian;(iii) A vulnerable adult, where the petitioner is an interested person; or(iv) Any other adult for whom the petitioner demonstrates to the court's satisfaction that the petitioner is interested in the adult's well-being, the court's intervention is necessary, and the adult cannot file the petition because of age, disability, health, or inaccessibility.(g)(i) A petition for an impaired driving protection order, which must allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by driving or having physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor.(ii) The petition must include any information known to the petitioner regarding the respondent's history of driving or having physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. The petition must also identify information the petitioner is able to provide about vehicles driven by the respondent.(iii) A petition for an impaired driving protection order may be filed by:(A) An intimate partner or a family or household member of the respondent;(B) A law enforcement agency;(C) A prosecuting attorney as defined in RCW 36.27.005 or 35.23.111, or any attorney authorized to prosecute cases in court of limited jurisdiction; or (D) An interested person, as defined in RCW 7.105.010(21)(b).(2) With the exception of vulnerable adult protection orders, a person under 18 years of age who is 15 years of age or older may seek relief under this chapter as a petitioner and is not required to seek relief through a petition filed on his or her behalf. He or she may also petition on behalf of a family or household member who is a minor if chosen by the minor and capable of pursuing the minor's stated interest in the action.(3) A person under 15 years of age who is seeking relief under this chapter is required to seek relief by a person authorized as a petitioner under this section.(4) If a petition for a protection order is filed by an interested person, the affidavit or declaration must also include a statement of why the petitioner qualifies as an interested person.(5) A petition for any type of protection order must not be dismissed or denied on the basis that the conduct alleged by the petitioner would meet the criteria for the issuance of another type of protection order. If a petition meets the criteria for a different type of protection order other than the one sought by the petitioner, the court shall consider the petitioner's preference, and enter a temporary protection order or set the matter for a hearing as appropriate under the law. The court's decision on the appropriate type of order shall not be premised on alleviating any potential stigma on the respondent.(6) The protection order petition must contain a section where the petitioner, regardless of petition type, may request specific relief provided for in RCW 7.105.310 that the petitioner seeks for himself or herself or for family or household members who are minors. The totality of selected relief, and any other relief the court deems appropriate for the petitioner, or family or household members who are minors, must be considered at the time of entry of temporary protection orders and at the time of entry of full protection orders.(7) If a court reviewing the petition for a protection order or a request for a temporary protection order determines that the petition was not filed in the correct court, the court shall enter findings establishing the correct court, and direct the clerk to transfer the petition to the correct court and to provide notice of the transfer to all parties who have appeared.(8) Upon filing a petition for a protection order, the petitioner may request that the court enter an ex parte temporary protection order and an order to surrender and prohibit weapons without notice until a hearing on a full protection order may be held. When requested, there shall be a rebuttable presumption to include the petitioner's minor children as protected parties in the ex parte temporary domestic violence protection order until the full hearing to reduce the risk of harm to children during periods of heightened risk, unless there is good cause not to include the minor children. If the court denies the petitioner's request to include the minor children, the court shall make written findings why the children should not be included, pending the full hearing. An ex parte temporary protection order shall be effective for a fixed period of time and shall be issued initially for a period not to exceed 14 days, which may be extended for good cause.Sec. 4. RCW 7.105.115 and 2022 c 268 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By December 30, 2022, the administrative office of the courts shall:(a) Develop and distribute standard forms for petitions and orders issued under this chapter, and facilitate the use of online forms for electronic filings.(i) For all protection orders except extreme risk protection orders and impaired driving protection orders, the protection order must include, in a conspicuous location, a notice of criminal penalties resulting from a violation of the order, and the following statement: "You can be arrested even if the protected person or persons invite or allow you to violate the order. You alone are responsible for following the order. Only the court may change the order. Requests for changes must be made in writing."(ii) For extreme risk protection orders and impaired driving protection orders, the protection order must include, in a conspicuous location, a notice of criminal penalties resulting from a violation of the order, and the following statement: "You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating this order's provisions. Only the court may change the order. Requests for changes must be made in writing.";(b) Develop and distribute instructions and informational brochures regarding protection orders and a court staff handbook on the protection order process, which shall be made available online to view and download at no cost. Developing additional methods to inform the public about protection orders in understandable terms and in languages other than English through videos and social media should also be considered. The instructions, brochures, forms, and handbook must be prepared in consultation with civil legal aid, culturally specific advocacy programs, and domestic violence and sexual assault advocacy programs. The instructions must be designed to assist petitioners in completing the petition, and must include a sample of standard petition and protection order forms. The instructions and standard petition must include a means for the petitioner to identify, with only lay knowledge, the firearms the respondent may own, possess, receive, have access to, or have in the respondent's custody or control. The instructions must provide pictures of types of firearms that the petitioner may choose from to identify the relevant firearms, or an equivalent means to allow petitioners to identify firearms without requiring specific or technical knowledge regarding the firearms. The court staff handbook must allow for the addition of a community resource list by the court clerk. The informational brochure must describe the use of, and the process for, obtaining, renewing, modifying, terminating, and enforcing protection orders as provided under this chapter, as well as the process for obtaining, modifying, terminating, and enforcing an antiharassment no-contact order as provided under chapter 9A.46 RCW, a domestic violence no-contact order as provided under chapter 10.99 RCW, a restraining order as provided under chapters 26.09, 26.26A, 26.26B, and 26.44 RCW, a foreign protection order as defined in chapter 26.52 RCW, and a Canadian domestic violence protection order as defined in RCW 26.55.010;(c) Determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the state. The administrative office of the courts shall then arrange for translation of the instructions and informational brochures required by this section, which must contain a sample of the standard petition and protection order forms, into the languages spoken by at least the top five significant non-English-speaking populations, and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to all court clerks and to the Washington supreme court's interpreter commission, minority and justice commission, and gender and justice commission. Such materials must be updated and distributed if needed due to relevant changes in the law;(d)(i) Distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms, instructions, and informational brochures to all court clerks, and distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms to all superior, district, and municipal courts;(ii) In collaboration with civil legal aid attorneys, domestic violence advocates, sexual assault advocates, elder abuse advocates, clerks, and judicial officers, develop and distribute a single petition form that a petitioner may use to file for any type of protection order authorized by this chapter, with the exception of extreme risk protection orders and impaired driving protection orders;(iii) For extreme risk protection orders, develop and prepare:(A) A standard petition and order form for an extreme risk protection order, as well as a standard petition and order form for an extreme risk protection order sought against a respondent under 18 years of age, titled "Extreme Risk Protection Order - Respondent Under 18 Years";(B) Pattern forms to assist in streamlining the process for those persons who are eligible to seal records relating to an order under (d)(i) of this subsection, including:(I) A petition and declaration the respondent can complete to ensure that requirements for public sealing have been met; and(II) An order sealing the court records relating to that order; and(C) An informational brochure to be served on any respondent who is subject to a temporary or full protection order under (d)(iii)(A) of this subsection;(iv) For impaired driving protection orders, develop and prepare:(A) A standard petition and order form for an impaired driving protection order; and(B) An informational brochure to be served on any respondent who is subject to a temporary or full protection order under (d)(iv)(A) of this subsection;(e) Create a new confidential party information form to satisfy the purposes of the confidential information form and the law enforcement information sheet that will serve both the court's and law enforcement's data entry needs without requiring a redundant effort for the petitioner, and ensure the petitioner's confidential information is protected for the purpose of safety. The form should be created with the presumption that it will also be used by the respondent to provide all current contact information needed by the court and law enforcement, and full identifying information for improved data entry. The form should also prompt the petitioner to disclose on the form whether the person who the petitioner is seeking to restrain has a disability, brain injury, or impairment requiring special assistance; and(f) Update the instructions, brochures, standard petition and order for protection forms, and court staff handbook when changes in the law make an update necessary.(2) By July 1, 2022, the administrative office of the courts, through the gender and justice commission of the Washington state supreme court, and with the support of the Washington state women's commission, shall work with representatives of superior, district, and municipal court judicial officers, court clerks, and administrators, including those with experience in protection order proceedings, as well as advocates and practitioners with expertise in each type of protection order, and others with relevant expertise, to develop for the courts:(a) Standards for filing evidence in protection order proceedings in a manner that protects victim safety and privacy, including evidence in the form of text messages, social media messages, voice mails, and other recordings, and the development of a sealed cover sheet for explicit or intimate images and recordings; and(b) Requirements for private vendors who provide services related to filing systems for protection orders, as well as what data should be collected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:For impaired driving protection order hearings, the following apply:(1) The court may:(a) Examine under oath the petitioner, the respondent, and any witnesses they may produce, or, in lieu of examination, consider sworn declarations of the petitioner, the respondent, and any witnesses they may produce; and(b) Ensure that a reasonable search has been conducted for criminal history records and civil protection order history related to the respondent.(2) In determining whether grounds for an impaired driving protection order exists, the court may consider any relevant evidence including, but not limited to, any of the following:(a) Corroborated evidence of alcohol misuse by the respondent;(b) Corroborated evidence that the respondent has driven or had physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; and(c) History of the respondent's prior arrest, deferred prosecution, or conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, an equivalent local ordinance, or any offense involving alcohol.Sec. 6. RCW 7.105.225 and 2024 c 298 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The court shall issue a protection order if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner has proved the required criteria specified in (a) through (((f)))(g) of this subsection for obtaining a protection order under this chapter.(a) For a domestic violence protection order, that the petitioner has been subjected to domestic violence by the respondent.(b) For a sexual assault protection order, that the petitioner has been subjected to nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or commercial sexual exploitation by the respondent.(c) For a stalking protection order, that the petitioner has been subjected to stalking by the respondent.(d) For a vulnerable adult protection order, that the petitioner has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected, or is threatened with abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect by the respondent.(e) For an extreme risk protection order, that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing, accessing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm.(f) For an antiharassment protection order, that the petitioner has been subjected to unlawful harassment by the respondent.(g) For an impaired driving protection order, that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by driving or having physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor.(2) The court may not deny or dismiss a petition for a protection order on the grounds that:(a) The petitioner or the respondent is a minor, unless provisions in this chapter specifically limit relief or remedies based upon a party's age;(b) The petitioner did not report the conduct giving rise to the petition to law enforcement;(c) A no-contact order or a restraining order that restrains the respondent's contact with the petitioner has been issued in a criminal proceeding or in a domestic relations proceeding;(d) The relief sought by the petitioner may be available in a different action or proceeding, or criminal charges are pending against the respondent;(e) The conduct at issue did not occur recently or because of the passage of time since the last incident of conduct giving rise to the petition; or(f) The respondent no longer lives near the petitioner.(3) In proceedings where the petitioner alleges that the respondent engaged in nonconsensual sexual conduct, nonconsensual sexual penetration, or commercial sexual exploitation, the court shall not require proof of physical injury on the person of the petitioner or any other forensic evidence. Denial of a remedy to the petitioner may not be based, in whole or in part, on evidence that:(a) The respondent was voluntarily intoxicated;(b) The petitioner was voluntarily intoxicated; or(c) The petitioner engaged in limited consensual sexual touching.(4) In proceedings where the petitioner alleges that the respondent engaged in stalking, the court may not require proof of the respondent's intentions regarding the acts alleged by the petitioner.(5) In proceedings where the petitioner alleges that the respondent engaged in commercial sexual exploitation, denial of a remedy to the petitioner may not be based, in whole or in part, on evidence that the petitioner consented to sexual conduct or sexual penetration.(6) If the court declines to issue a protection order, the court shall state in writing the particular reasons for the court's denial. If the court declines a request to include one or more of the petitioner's family or household member who is a minor or a vulnerable adult in the order, the court shall state the reasons for that denial in writing. The court shall also explain from the bench:(a) That the petitioner may refile a petition for a protection order at any time if the petitioner has new evidence to present that would support the issuance of a protection order;(b) The parties' rights to seek revision, reconsideration, or appeal of the order; and(c) The parties' rights to have access to the court transcript or recording of the hearing.(7) A court's ruling on a protection order must be filed by the court in writing and must be made by the court on the mandatory form developed by the administrative office of the courts.Sec. 7. RCW 7.105.300 and 2021 c 215 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:RCW 7.105.305 through 7.105.325 apply to all orders other than extreme risk protection orders and impaired driving protection orders.Sec. 8. RCW 7.105.310 and 2022 c 268 s 17 and 2022 c 231 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) In issuing any type of protection order, other than an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order as limited by subsection (2) of this section, and other than an extreme risk protection order or an impaired driving protection order, the court shall have broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including an order that provides relief as follows:(a) Restrain the respondent from committing any of the following acts against the petitioner and other persons protected by the order: Domestic violence; nonconsensual sexual conduct or nonconsensual sexual penetration; sexual abuse; stalking; acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult; and unlawful harassment;(b) Restrain the respondent from making any attempts to have contact, including nonphysical contact, with the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household, either directly, indirectly, or through third parties regardless of whether those third parties know of the order;(c) Exclude the respondent from the residence that the parties share;(d) Exclude the respondent from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner; or from the day care or school of a minor child;(e) Restrain the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance from a specified location including, but not limited to, a residence, school, day care, workplace, the protected party's person, and the protected party's vehicle. The specified distance shall presumptively be at least 1,000 feet, unless the court for good cause finds that a shorter specified distance is appropriate;(f) If the parties have children in common, make residential provisions with regard to their minor children on the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW. However, parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09 RCW must not be required under this chapter. The court may not delay or defer relief under this chapter on the grounds that the parties could seek a parenting plan or modification to a parenting plan in a different action. A protection order must not be denied on the grounds that the parties have an existing parenting plan in effect. A protection order may suspend the respondent's contact with the parties' children under an existing parenting plan, subject to further orders in a family law proceeding;(g) Order the respondent to participate in a state-certified domestic violence perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 43.20A.735 or a state-certified sex offender treatment program approved under RCW 18.155.070;(h) Order the respondent to obtain a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation. If the court determines that a mental health evaluation is necessary, the court shall clearly document the reason for this determination and provide a specific question or questions to be answered by the mental health professional. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for an evaluation. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;(i) In cases where the petitioner and the respondent are students who attend the same public or private elementary, middle, or high school, the court, when issuing a protection order and providing relief, shall consider, among the other facts of the case, the severity of the act, any continuing physical danger, emotional distress, or educational disruption to the petitioner, and the financial difficulty and educational disruption that would be caused by a transfer of the respondent to another school. The court may order that the respondent not attend the public or private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the petitioner. If a minor respondent is prohibited attendance at the minor's assigned public school, the school district must provide the student comparable educational services in another setting. In such a case, the district shall provide transportation at no cost to the respondent if the respondent's parent or legal guardian is unable to pay for transportation. The district shall put in place any needed supports to ensure successful transition to the new school environment. The court shall send notice of the restriction on attending the same school as the petitioner to the public or private school the respondent will attend and to the school the petitioner attends;(j) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs and service fees, as established by the county or municipality incurring the expense, and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees or limited license legal technician fees when such fees are incurred by a person licensed and practicing in accordance with state supreme court admission and practice rule 28, the limited practice rule for limited license legal technicians. Minors are presumed to be unable to pay. The parent or legal guardian is responsible for costs unless the parent or legal guardian demonstrates inability to pay;(k) Restrain the respondent from harassing, following, monitoring, keeping under physical or electronic surveillance, cyber harassment as defined in RCW 9A.90.120, and using telephonic, audiovisual, or other electronic means to monitor the actions, location, or communication of the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or other members of the petitioner's household. For the purposes of this subsection, "communication" includes both "wire communication" and "electronic communication" as defined in RCW 9.73.260;(l) Other than for respondents who are minors, require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The order must specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for electronic monitoring;(m) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800, and order the respondent to surrender, and prohibit the respondent from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, attempting to purchase or receive, or receiving, all firearms, dangerous weapons, and any concealed pistol license, as required in RCW 9.41.800;(n) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The court shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient specificity to make it clear which property is included. Personal effects may include pets. The court may order that a petitioner be granted the exclusive custody or control of any pet owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the petitioner, respondent, or minor child residing with either the petitioner or respondent, and may prohibit the respondent from interfering with the petitioner's efforts to obtain the pet. The court may also prohibit the respondent from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of specified locations where the pet is regularly found;(o) Order use of a vehicle;(p) Enter an order restricting the respondent from engaging in abusive litigation as set forth in chapter 26.51 RCW or in frivolous filings against the petitioner, making harassing or libelous communications about the petitioner to third parties, or making false reports to investigative agencies. A petitioner may request this relief in the petition or by separate motion. A petitioner may request this relief by separate motion at any time within five years of the date the protection order is entered even if the order has since expired. A stand-alone motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought by a party who meets the requirements of chapter 26.51 RCW regardless of whether the party has previously sought a protection order under this chapter, provided the motion is made within five years of the date the order that made a finding of domestic violence was entered. In cases where a finding of domestic violence was entered pursuant to an order under chapter 26.09, 26.26, or 26.26A RCW, a motion for an order restricting abusive litigation may be brought under the family law case or as a stand-alone action filed under this chapter, when it is not reasonable or practical to file under the family law case;(q) Restrain the respondent from committing acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation against a vulnerable adult;(r) Require an accounting by the respondent of the disposition of the vulnerable adult's income or other resources;(s) Restrain the transfer of either the respondent's or vulnerable adult's property, or both, for a specified period not exceeding 90 days;(t) Order financial relief and restrain the transfer of jointly owned assets;(u) Restrain the respondent from possessing or distributing intimate images, as defined in RCW 9A.86.010, depicting the petitioner including, but not limited to, requiring the respondent to: Take down and delete all intimate images and recordings of the petitioner in the respondent's possession or control; and cease any and all disclosure of those intimate images. The court may also inform the respondent that it would be appropriate to ask third parties in possession or control of the intimate images of this protection order to take down and delete the intimate images so that the order may not inadvertently be violated; or(v) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of the petitioner and other family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults for whom the petitioner has sought protection, including orders or directives to a law enforcement officer, as allowed under this chapter.(2) In an antiharassment protection order proceeding, the court may grant the relief specified in subsection (1)(c), (f), and (t) of this section only as part of a full antiharassment protection order.(3) The court in granting a temporary antiharassment protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order shall not prohibit the respondent from exercising constitutionally protected free speech. Nothing in this section prohibits the petitioner from utilizing other civil or criminal remedies to restrain conduct or communications not otherwise constitutionally protected.(4) The court shall not take any of the following actions in issuing a protection order.(a) The court may not order the petitioner to obtain services including, but not limited to, drug testing, victim support services, a mental health assessment, or a psychological evaluation.(b) The court shall not issue a full protection order to any party except upon notice to the respondent and the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 7.105.210, the court shall not issue a temporary protection order to any party unless the party has filed a petition or counter-petition for a protection order seeking relief in accordance with this chapter.(c) Under no circumstances shall the court deny the petitioner the type of protection order sought in the petition on the grounds that the court finds that a different type of protection order would have a less severe impact on the respondent.(5) The order shall specify the date the order expires, if any. For permanent orders, the court shall set the date to expire 99 years from the issuance date. The order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following personal service, service by electronic means, service by mail, or service by publication, and whether the court has approved service by mail or publication of an order issued under this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:(1) Where it appears from the petition and any additional evidence that the respondent has engaged in conduct that serves as a basis for an impaired driving protection order under this chapter, and the petitioner alleges that serious immediate harm or irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued immediately without prior notice to the respondent, the court may grant an ex parte temporary impaired driving protection order, pending a full hearing. In considering whether to issue a temporary impaired driving protection order, the court shall consider all relevant evidence, including the evidence described in section 5 of this act.(2) The court has broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including the forms of relief listed in section 11 of this act. The court may not order a form of relief listed in section 11 of this act if it would not be feasible or appropriate for the respondent to comply with such a requirement before a full hearing is held on the petition for a protection order. If the court does not order all the relief requested by the petitioner in an ex parte temporary impaired driving protection order, the court shall still consider ordering such relief at the full hearing on the petition for an impaired driving protection order.(3) An impaired driving protection order issued under this section must contain the date, time of issuance, and expiration date.(4) The court may issue an ex parte temporary impaired driving protection order on the petition with or without a hearing. If an ex parte temporary impaired driving protection order is denied, the court shall still set a full hearing unless the court determines the petition does not contain prima facie allegations to support the issuance of an impaired driving protection order. If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary protection order as requested or declines to set a hearing, the court shall state the reasons in writing. The court's denial of a motion for an ex parte temporary impaired driving protection order shall be filed with the court.(5) If a full hearing is set on a petition that is filed before close of business on a judicial day, the hearing must be set not later than 14 days from the date of the filing of the petition. If a full hearing is set on a petition that is submitted after close of business on a judicial day or is submitted on a nonjudicial day, the hearing must be set not later than 14 days from the first judicial day after the petition is filed, which may be extended for good cause.(6) If the court does not set a full hearing, the petitioner may file an amended petition within 14 days of the court's denial. If the court determines the amended petition does not contain prima facie allegations to support the issuance of an impaired driving protection order or if the petitioner fails to file an amended petition within the required time, the court may enter an order dismissing the petition.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:(1) The court may not issue a full impaired driving protection order to any party except upon notice to the respondent and the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to a petition filed and served by the party seeking relief in accordance with this chapter.(2) An impaired driving protection order issued after notice and a hearing, must include a statement of the grounds supporting the issuance of the order. (3) When issuing an impaired driving protection order after notice to the respondent and a hearing, the court may either grant relief for a fixed period of time of not less than one year unless the petitioner has specifically requested relief for a shorter period of time, or enter a permanent impaired driving protection order.(4) The order must specify the date the order expires, if any. For permanent orders, the court shall set the date to expire 99 years from the issuance date. The order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following personal service, service by electronic means, service by mail, or service by publication, and whether the court has approved service by mail or publication of an order issued under this section.(5) When the court issues an impaired driving protection order, the court shall inform the respondent that the respondent is entitled to request termination of the order in the manner prescribed in section 16 of this act. The court shall provide the respondent with a form to request a termination hearing.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:(1) In issuing an impaired driving protection order, the court has broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper, including an order that provides relief as follows: (a) Require the respondent to have a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor vehicles operated by the respondent, with proof of installation filed with the court by the person or the certified interlock provider within five business days from the date of the impaired driving protection order. The court shall establish a specific alcohol set point at which the ignition interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started;(b) Order the respondent to refrain from consuming any alcohol;(c) Order the respondent to stay away from bars or taverns;(d) Order the respondent to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system. The respondent shall pay for the cost of the monitoring, unless the court specifies that the cost of monitoring will be paid with funds that are available from an alternative source identified by the court;(e) Order the respondent to comply with 24/7 sobriety program monitoring, as defined in RCW 36.28A.330;(f) Order the respondent to obtain a substance use disorder evaluation and to comply with the treatment recommendations; and(g) Order the respondent to participate in a minimum of two meetings per week of an alcoholism self-help recovery support group.(2) If the respondent is required, as part of his or her employment, to operate a vehicle that is owned by the respondent's employer and that is exempt from the installation of an ignition interlock device pursuant to RCW 46.20.720(6), the court shall consider ordering the respondent to submit to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device, transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect alcohol in a person's system.(3) The court shall immediately notify the department of licensing when an ignition interlock restriction is imposed on a respondent as part of an impaired driving protection order. If the court imposes an ignition interlock restriction, the department of licensing shall attach or imprint a notation on the respondent's driving record, stating that the respondent may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:(1) The clerk of the court shall enter an impaired driving protection order issued under this chapter into a statewide judicial information system on the same day such order is issued, if possible, but no later than the next judicial day.(2) A copy of an impaired driving protection order granted under this chapter, must be forwarded immediately by the clerk of the court, by electronic means if possible, to the law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order must remain in the computer until the expiration date specified on the order. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.(3) The information entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system must include notice to law enforcement on whether the order was personally served, served by electronic means, served by publication, or served by mail.(4) If a law enforcement agency receives an impaired driving protection order for entry or service, but the order falls outside the agency's jurisdiction, the agency may enter and serve the order or may immediately forward it to the appropriate law enforcement agency for entry and service, and shall provide documentation back to the court verifying which law enforcement agency has entered and will serve the order.Sec. 13. RCW 7.105.405 and 2024 c 298 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:The following provisions apply to the renewal of all full protection orders issued under this chapter, with the exception of the renewal of extreme risk protection orders and impaired driving protection orders.(1) If the court grants a protection order for a fixed time period, the petitioner may file a motion to renew the order at any time within the 90 days before the order expires. The motion for renewal must state the reasons the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of a motion for renewal, the court shall order a hearing, which must be not later than 14 days from the date of the order. Service must be made on the respondent not less than five judicial days before the hearing, as provided in RCW 7.105.150.(2) If the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's motion and statement of the reason for the requested renewal.(3) The petitioner bears no burden of proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of harm by the respondent.(4) The court shall grant the motion for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in circumstances and the following:(a) For a domestic violence protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members who are minors or vulnerable adults when the order expires;(b) For a sexual assault protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not engage in, or attempt to engage in, physical or nonphysical contact, or acts of commercial sexual exploitation, with the petitioner when the order expires;(c) For a stalking protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of stalking against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or household members when the order expires;(d) For a vulnerable adult protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume acts of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect against the vulnerable adult when the order expires; or(e) For an antiharassment protection order, that the respondent proves that the respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order expires.(5) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances, the court may consider the following unweighted factors, and no inference is to be drawn from the order in which the factors are listed:(a) Whether the respondent has committed or threatened sexual assault; commercial sexual exploitation; domestic violence; stalking; abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult; or other harmful acts against the petitioner or any other person since the protection order was entered;(b) Whether the respondent has violated the terms of the protection order and the time that has passed since the entry of the order;(c) Whether the respondent has exhibited suicidal ideation or attempts since the protection order was entered;(d) Whether the respondent has been convicted of criminal activity since the protection order was entered;(e) Whether the respondent has either: Acknowledged responsibility for acts of sexual assault, commercial sexual exploitation, domestic violence, or stalking, or acts of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult, or behavior that resulted in the entry of the protection order; or successfully completed state-certified perpetrator treatment or counseling since the protection order was entered;(f) Whether the respondent has a continuing involvement with drug or alcohol abuse, if such abuse was a factor in the protection order; and(g) Other factors relating to a substantial change in circumstances.(6) The court shall not deny a motion to renew a protection order for any of the following reasons:(a) The respondent has not violated the protection order previously issued by the court;(b) The petitioner or the respondent is a minor;(c) The petitioner did not report the conduct giving rise to the protection order, or subsequent violations of the protection order, to law enforcement;(d) A no-contact order or a restraining order that restrains the respondent's contact with the petitioner has been issued in a criminal proceeding or in a domestic relations proceeding;(e) The relief sought by the petitioner may be available in a different action or proceeding;(f) The passage of time since the last incident of conduct giving rise to the issuance of the protection order; or(g) The respondent no longer lives near the petitioner.(7) The terms of the original protection order must not be changed on a motion for renewal unless the petitioner has requested the change.(8) The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time period of no less than one year, or may enter a permanent order as provided in this section.(9) If the protection order includes the parties' children, a renewed protection order may be issued for more than one year, subject to subsequent orders entered in a proceeding under chapter 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.(10) The court may award court costs, service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees to the petitioner as provided in RCW 7.105.310.(11) If the court declines to renew the protection order, the court shall state, in writing in the order, the particular reasons for the court's denial. If the court declines to renew a protection order that had restrained the respondent from having contact with children protected by the order, the court shall determine on the record whether the respondent and the children should undergo reunification therapy. Any reunification therapy provider should be made aware of the respondent's history of domestic violence and should have training and experience in the dynamics of intimate partner violence.(12) In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances for respondents under the age of 18, or in determining the appropriate duration for an order, the court shall consider the circumstances surrounding the respondent's youth at the time of the initial behavior alleged in the petition for a protection order. The court shall consider developmental factors, including the impact of time of a youth's development, and any information the minor respondent presents about his or her personal progress or change in circumstances.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:The following provisions apply to the renewal of impaired driving protection orders.(1) The court must notify the petitioner of the impending expiration of the impaired driving protection order. Notice must be received by the petitioner 105 calendar days before the date the order expires.(2) The petitioner may by motion request a renewal of the impaired driving protection order at any time within 90 days before the expiration of the order.(a) Upon receipt of the motion to renew, the court shall order that a hearing be held not later than 14 days from the date the order issues.(b) In determining whether to renew an impaired driving protection order issued under this section, the court shall consider all relevant evidence presented by the petitioner and follow the same procedure as provided in section 5 of this act.(c) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the requirements for the issuance of an impaired driving protection order as provided in section 5 of this act continue to be met, the court shall renew the order. However, if, after notice, the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's motion and statement of the reason for the requested renewal.(d) The renewal of an impaired driving protection order has a duration of one year, subject to termination as provided in section 16 of this act or further renewal by order of the court.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:(1) Any person who files a petition for an impaired driving protection order knowing the information in such petition to be materially false, or with the intent to harass the respondent, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person who has knowledge that he or she is subject to an impaired driving protection order and who drives or has physical control of a motor vehicle while out of compliance with any requirement of the impaired driving protection order, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The sentencing court shall consider extending the provisions of the existing impaired driving protection order for a period of five years from the date the existing order expires.(b) Any person who has two or more previous convictions for violating an impaired driving protection order issued under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. A new section is added to chapter 7.105 RCW to read as follows:The following applies to modification and termination of impaired driving protection orders:(1) The respondent may submit one written request for a hearing to modify or terminate an impaired driving protection order issued under this chapter every 12-month period that the order is in effect, starting from the date of the order and continuing through any renewals. (2) Upon receipt of the request for a hearing to modify or terminate an impaired driving protection order, the court shall set a date for a hearing. The hearing must occur no sooner than 14 days and no later than 30 days from the date of service of the request upon the petitioner. (3) The respondent shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a substantial change in circumstances such that the respondent no longer poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by driving or having physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. In determining whether there has been a substantial change in circumstances, the court may consider any relevant evidence, including evidence of the considerations listed in section 5 of this act and any additional evidence submitted by the respondent, including: (a) A declaration from the respondent's ignition interlock device vendor that there have been none of the following incidents for the duration of the impaired driving protection order:(i) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration at levels that exceed the specific alcohol set point established by the court in the impaired driving protection order, unless a subsequent test performed within 10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration below the specific alcohol set point and the digital image confirms the respondent provided both samples; (ii) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the respondent at the time of the missed test;(iii) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of lower than the specific alcohol set point established by the court in the impaired driving protection order, unless a subsequent test performed within 10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than the specific alcohol set point established by the court in the impaired driving protection order, and the digital image confirms the respondent provided both samples;(iv) Failure of the respondent to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or(v) Removal of the ignition interlock device by a person other than an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol; (b) A declaration dated within 60 days of the expiration of the impaired driving protection order from the respondent's ignition interlock device vendor that the ignition interlock device was inspected by an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol and no evidence was found that the device was tampered with in the manner described in RCW 46.20.750;(c) Evidence of compliance with 24/7 sobriety program monitoring; (d) A declaration from the respondent's alcohol monitoring device vendor that for the duration of the impaired driving protection order, the respondent has no confirmed consumption of alcohol and no confirmed attempt to tamper or circumvent testing; (e) Evidence of completion of a substance use disorder evaluation and any recommended treatment; and(f) Evidence of regular and continued attendance at meetings of an alcoholism self-help recovery support group. (4) If the court finds after the hearing that the respondent has met his or her burden, the court shall modify or terminate the order. (5) If the court authorizes removal of an ignition interlock restriction imposed under this chapter, the court shall immediately notify the department of licensing regarding the lifting of the ignition interlock restriction and the department of licensing shall release any attachment, imprint, or notation on such person's driving record relating to the ignition interlock requirement imposed under this chapter.Sec. 17. RCW 7.105.550 and 2021 c 215 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Any order available under this chapter, other than an extreme risk protection order or an impaired driving protection order, may be issued in actions under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW. If a protection order is issued in an action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW, the order must be issued on the forms mandated by RCW 7.105.115. An order issued in accordance with this subsection (1)(a) is fully enforceable and must be enforced under the provisions of this chapter.(b) If a party files an action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW, an order issued previously under this chapter between the same parties may be consolidated by the court under that action and cause number. Any order issued under this chapter after consolidation must contain the original cause number and the cause number of the action under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW.(2) Nothing in chapter 215, Laws of 2021 affects the validity of protection orders issued prior to July 1, 2022, under chapter 74.34 RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 7.94, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW. Protection orders entered prior to July 1, 2022, under chapter 74.34 RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 7.94, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW are subject to the provisions of chapter 215, Laws of 2021 and are fully enforceable under the applicable provisions of RCW 7.105.450 through 7.105.470 and may be modified or terminated in accordance with the applicable provisions of RCW 7.105.500 through ((7.105.550))7.105.515.Sec. 18. RCW 46.20.720 and 2020 c 330 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Ignition interlock restriction. The department shall require that a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device:(a) Pretrial release. Upon receipt of notice from a court that an ignition interlock device restriction has been imposed under RCW 10.21.055;(b) Ignition interlock driver's license. As required for issuance of an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385;(c) Deferred prosecution. Upon receipt of notice from a court that the person is participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation of:(i) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance; or(ii) RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person would be required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person in the event of a conviction;(d) Post conviction. After any applicable period of mandatory suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, or upon fulfillment of day-for-day credit under RCW 46.61.5055(9)(b)(ii) for a suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges:(i) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance; or(ii) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person; ((or))(e) Court order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that a person charged or convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific alcohol set point at which the ignition interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time for which ignition interlock use will be required; or(f) Impaired driving civil protection order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that an ignition interlock restriction has been imposed as part of an impaired driving protection order issued under chapter 7.105 RCW.(2) Alcohol set point. Unless otherwise specified by the court for a restriction imposed under subsection (1)(e) of this section, the ignition interlock device shall have an alcohol set point that prevents the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.020 or more.(3) Duration of restriction. A restriction imposed under:(a) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall remain in effect until:(i) The court has authorized the removal of the device under RCW 10.21.055; or(ii) The department has imposed a restriction under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.(b) Subsection (1)(b) of this section remains in effect during the validity of any ignition interlock driver's license that has been issued to the person.(c) Subsection (1)(c)(i) or (d)(i) of this section shall be for no less than:(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this subsection, a period of one year;(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(i) of this subsection, a period of five years;(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of ten years.The restriction of a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and who committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of sixteen were in the vehicle shall be extended for an additional period as required by RCW 46.61.5055(6)(a).(d) Subsection (1)(c)(ii) or (d)(ii) of this section shall be for a period of no less than six months.(e) The period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be extended by one hundred eighty days whenever the department receives notice that the restricted person has been convicted under RCW 46.20.740 or 46.20.750. If the period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection has been fulfilled and cannot be extended, the department must add a new one hundred eighty-day restriction that is imposed from the date of conviction and is subject to the requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section.(f) Subsection (1)(e) or (f) of this section shall remain in effect for the period of time specified by the court.(g) The period of restriction under (c) and (d) of this subsection based on incidents occurring on or after June 9, 2016, must be tolled for any period in which the person does not have an ignition interlock device installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person unless the person receives a determination from the department that the person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device due to a physical disability. The department's determination that a person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction. The department may charge a person seeking a medical exemption under this subsection a reasonable fee for the assessment.(4) Requirements for removal. A restriction imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or approved by the department, certifying the following:(a) That there have been none of the following incidents in the one hundred eighty consecutive days prior to the date of release:(i) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.04 and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;(ii) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the driver at the time of the missed test;(iii) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of lower than 0.020 unless a subsequent test performed within ten minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.020, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;(iv) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or(v) Removal of the ignition interlock device by a person other than an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol; and(b) That the ignition interlock device was inspected at the conclusion of the one hundred eighty-day period by an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol and no evidence was found that the device was tampered with in the manner described in RCW 46.20.750.(5) Day-for-day credit. (a) The time period during which a person has an ignition interlock device installed in order to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.(b) The department must also give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period, beginning from the date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates, other than those subject to the employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.(c) If the day-for-day credit granted under this subsection equals or exceeds the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident, and the person has already met the requirements for removal of the device under subsection (4) of this section, the department may waive the requirement that a device be installed or that the person again meet the requirements for removal.(6) Employer exemption. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours. When the department receives a declaration under this subsection, it shall attach or imprint a notation on the person's driving record stating that the employer exemption applies.(b) The employer exemption does not apply when the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment.(7) Ignition interlock device revolving account. In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this section, the person shall pay an additional fee of twenty-one dollars per month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional fee to the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device revolving account, except that the company may retain twenty-five cents per month of the additional fee to cover the expenses associated with administering the fee. The department may waive the monthly fee if the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010.(8) Foreign jurisdiction. For a person restricted under this section who is residing outside of the state of Washington, the department may accept verification of installation of an ignition interlock device by an ignition interlock company authorized to do business in the jurisdiction in which the person resides, provided the device meets any applicable requirements of that jurisdiction. The department may waive one or more requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section if compliance with the requirement or requirements would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction, provided the person is in compliance with any equivalent requirement of that jurisdiction. The department may waive the monthly fee required by subsection (7) of this section if collection of the fee would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction.Sec. 19. RCW 46.20.720 and 2024 c 306 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Ignition interlock restriction. The department shall require that a person may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device:(a) Pretrial release. Upon receipt of notice from a court that an ignition interlock device restriction has been imposed under RCW 10.21.055;(b) Ignition interlock driver's license. As required for issuance of an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385;(c) Deferred prosecution. Upon receipt of notice from a court that the person is participating in a deferred prosecution program under RCW 10.05.020 for a violation of:(i) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance; or(ii) RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person would be required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person in the event of a conviction;(d) Post conviction. After any applicable period of mandatory suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges, or upon fulfillment of day-for-day credit under RCW 46.61.5055(9)(b)(ii) for a suspension, revocation, or denial of driving privileges:(i) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local or out-of-state statute or ordinance; or(ii) Due to a conviction of a violation of RCW 46.61.5249 or 46.61.500 or an equivalent local ordinance if the person is required under RCW 46.61.5249(4) or 46.61.500(3) (a) or (b) to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person; ((or))(e) Court order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that a person charged or convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock. The court shall establish a specific alcohol set point at which the ignition interlock will prevent the vehicle from being started. The court shall also establish the period of time for which ignition interlock use will be required; or(f) Impaired driving civil protection order. Upon receipt of an order by a court having jurisdiction that an ignition interlock restriction has been imposed as part of an impaired driving protection order issued under chapter 7.105 RCW.(2) Alcohol set point. Unless otherwise specified by the court for a restriction imposed under subsection (1)(e) of this section, the ignition interlock device shall have an alcohol set point that prevents the motor vehicle from being started when the breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.020 or more.(3) Duration of restriction. A restriction imposed under:(a) Subsection (1)(a) of this section shall remain in effect until:(i) The court has authorized the removal of the device under RCW 10.21.055; or(ii) The department has imposed a restriction under subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.(b) Subsection (1)(b) of this section remains in effect during the validity of any ignition interlock driver's license that has been issued to the person.(c) Subsection (1)(c)(i) or (d)(i) of this section shall be for no less than:(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this subsection, a period of one year;(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(i) of this subsection, a period of five years;(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (c)(ii) of this subsection, a period of 10 years.The restriction of a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance and who committed the offense while one or more passengers under the age of 16 were in the vehicle shall be extended for an additional period as required by RCW 46.61.5055(6)(a).For purposes of determining a period of restriction for a person restricted pursuant to a conviction under (d) of this subsection, a restriction based on a deferred prosecution under subsection (1)(c) of this section arising out of the same incident is not considered a prior restriction for purposes of this subsection.(d) Subsection (1)(c)(ii) or (d)(ii) of this section shall be for a period of no less than six months.(e) The period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection shall be extended by 180 days whenever the department receives notice that the restricted person has been convicted under RCW 46.20.740 or 46.20.750. If the period of restriction under (c) or (d) of this subsection has been fulfilled and cannot be extended, the department must add a new 180-day restriction that is imposed from the date of conviction and is subject to the requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section.(f) Subsection (1)(e) and (f) of this section shall remain in effect for the period of time specified by the court.(g) The period of restriction under (c) and (d) of this subsection based on incidents occurring on or after June 9, 2016, must be tolled for any period in which the person does not have an ignition interlock device installed on a vehicle owned or operated by the person unless the person receives a determination from the department that the person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device due to a physical disability. For all drivers restricted under this section with incidents and restriction start dates prior to June 9, 2016, a driver may apply to waive the restriction by applying for a determination from the department that the person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device due to a physical disability. The department's determination that a person is unable to operate an ignition interlock device must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence. This determination is subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction. The department may charge a person seeking a medical exemption under this subsection a reasonable fee for the assessment.(4) Requirements for removal. A restriction imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall remain in effect until the department receives a declaration from the person's ignition interlock device vendor, in a form provided or approved by the department, certifying the following:(a) That there have been none of the following incidents in the 180 consecutive days prior to the date of release:(i) Any attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more unless a subsequent test performed within 10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.04 and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;(ii) Failure to take any random test unless a review of the digital image confirms that the vehicle was not occupied by the driver at the time of the missed test;(iii) Failure to pass any random retest with a breath alcohol concentration of lower than 0.020 unless a subsequent test performed within 10 minutes registers a breath alcohol concentration lower than 0.020, and the digital image confirms the same person provided both samples;(iv) Failure of the person to appear at the ignition interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or(v) Removal of the ignition interlock device by a person other than an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol; and(b) That the ignition interlock device was inspected at the conclusion of the 180-day period by an ignition interlock technician certified by the Washington state patrol and no evidence was found that the device was tampered with in the manner described in RCW 46.20.750.(5) Day-for-day credit. (a) The time period during which a person has an ignition interlock device installed in order to meet the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section shall apply on a day-for-day basis toward satisfying the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident.(b) The department must also give the person a day-for-day credit for any time period, beginning from the date of the incident, during which the person kept an ignition interlock device installed on all vehicles the person operates, other than those subject to the employer exemption under subsection (6) of this section.(c) If the day-for-day credit granted under this subsection equals or exceeds the period of time the ignition interlock device restriction is imposed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section arising out of the same incident, and the person has already met the requirements for removal of the device under subsection (4) of this section, the department may waive the requirement that a device be installed or that the person again meet the requirements for removal.(6) Employer exemption. (a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the installation of an ignition interlock device is not necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours. The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW from his or her employer stating that the person's employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the employer or other persons during working hours. When the department receives a declaration under this subsection, it shall attach or imprint a notation on the person's driving record stating that the employer exemption applies.(b) The employer exemption does not apply when the employer's vehicle is assigned exclusively to the restricted driver and used solely for commuting to and from employment.(c) The employer exemption does not apply to a person who is self-employed unless the person's vehicle is used exclusively for the person's employment.(7) Ignition interlock device revolving account. In addition to any other costs associated with the use of an ignition interlock device imposed on the person restricted under this section, the person shall pay an additional fee of $21 per month. Payments must be made directly to the ignition interlock company. The company shall remit the additional fee to the department to be deposited into the ignition interlock device revolving account, except that the company may retain 25 cents per month of the additional fee to cover the expenses associated with administering the fee. The department may waive the monthly fee if the person is indigent under RCW 10.101.010.(8) Foreign jurisdiction. For a person restricted under this section who is residing outside of the state of Washington, the department may accept verification of installation of an ignition interlock device by an ignition interlock company authorized to do business in the jurisdiction in which the person resides, provided the device meets any applicable requirements of that jurisdiction. The department may waive one or more requirements for removal under subsection (4) of this section if compliance with the requirement or requirements would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction, provided the person is in compliance with any equivalent requirement of that jurisdiction. The department may waive the monthly fee required by subsection (7) of this section if collection of the fee would be impractical in the case of a person residing in another jurisdiction.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:(1) By July 1, 2026, the commission shall develop training for law enforcement personnel regarding impaired driving protection orders under chapter 7.105 RCW. The training must include information on the appropriate use of impaired driving protection orders by a law enforcement agency to prevent alcohol-impaired driving and the relief available under an impaired driving protection order. The training must also include information regarding the circumstances in which a peace officer may conduct a lawful motor vehicle stop based exclusively or primarily on a third-party report that a driver is driving the vehicle or has physical control of the vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. (2) By July 1, 2027, every peace officer currently employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency shall complete the training specified in subsection (1) of this section. (3) Beginning July 1, 2027, every new peace officer employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency shall complete the training specified in subsection (1) of this section within six months of employment.Sec. 21. RCW 36.28A.300 and 2014 c 221 s 912 are each amended to read as follows:There is created a 24/7 sobriety program to be administered by the criminal justice training commission in conjunction with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The program shall coordinate efforts among various local government entities for the purpose of implementing alternatives to incarceration for offenders convicted under RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 with one or more prior convictions under RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and facilitating compliance with impaired driving protection orders under chapter 7.105 RCW.Sec. 22. RCW 36.28A.330 and 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 36.28A.300 through 36.28A.390 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "24/7 sobriety program" means a program in which a participant submits to testing of the participant's blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substance to determine the presence of alcohol or any drug as defined in RCW 46.61.540. Testing must take place at a location or locations designated by the participating agency, or, with the concurrence of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, by an alternate method.(2) "Participant" means ((a)):(a) A person who has been charged with or convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or those crimes listed in RCW 46.61.5055(14), in which the use of alcohol or drugs as defined in RCW 46.61.540 was a contributing factor in the commission of the crime and who has been ordered by a court to participate in the 24/7 sobriety program; or(b) A person who has been ordered by a court to participate in the 24/7 sobriety program as part of an impaired driving protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW.(3) "Participating agency" means any entity located in the state of Washington that has a written agreement with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to participate in the 24/7 sobriety program, and includes, but is not limited to, a sheriff, a police chief, any other local, regional, or state corrections or probation entity, and any other entity designated by a sheriff, police chief, or any other local, regional, or state corrections or probation entity to perform testing in the 24/7 sobriety program.(4) "Participation agreement" means a written document executed by a participant agreeing to participate in the 24/7 sobriety program in a form approved by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs that contains the following information:(a) The type, frequency, and time period of testing;(b) The location of testing;(c) The fees and payment procedures required for testing; and(d) The responsibilities and obligations of the participant under the 24/7 sobriety program.Sec. 23. RCW 36.28A.390 and 2016 c 203 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A general authority Washington peace officer, as defined in RCW 10.93.020, who has probable cause to believe that a participant has violated the terms of participation in the 24/7 sobriety program may immediately take the participant into custody and cause him or her to be held until an appearance before a judge on the next judicial day.(2) A participant who violates the terms of participation in the 24/7 sobriety program or does not pay the required fees or associated costs pretrial or posttrial shall, at a minimum:(a) Receive a written warning notice for a first violation;(b) Serve a minimum of one day imprisonment for a second violation;(c) Serve a minimum of three ((days[']))days' imprisonment for a third violation;(d) Serve a minimum of five ((days[']))days' imprisonment for a fourth violation; and(e) Serve a minimum of seven ((days[']))days' imprisonment for a fifth or subsequent violation.(3) The court may remove a participant from the 24/7 sobriety program at any time for noncompliance with the terms of participation. If a participant is removed from the 24/7 sobriety program, the court shall send written notice to the department of licensing within five business days.(4) This section does not apply to a person whose participation in the 24/7 sobriety program is required based solely on an impaired driving protection order issued against the person under chapter 7.105 RCW.Sec. 24. RCW 7.105.105 and 2022 c 268 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The following apply to all petitions for protection orders under this chapter.(1)(a) By January 1, 2023, county clerks on behalf of all superior courts and, by January 1, 2026, all courts of limited jurisdiction, must permit petitions for protection orders and all other filings in connection with the petition to be submitted as preferred by the petitioner either: (i) In person; (ii) remotely through an electronic submission process; or (iii) by mail for persons who are incarcerated or who are otherwise unable to file in person or remotely through an electronic system. The court or clerk must make available electronically to judicial officers any protection orders filed within the state. Judicial officers may not be charged for access to such documents. The electronic submission system must allow for petitions for protection orders and supportive documents to be submitted at any time of the day. When a petition and supporting documents for a protection order are submitted to the clerk after business hours, they must be processed as soon as possible on the next judicial day. Petitioners and respondents should not incur additional charges for electronic submission for petitions and documents filed pursuant to this section.(b) By January 1, 2023, all superior courts' systems and, by January 1, 2026, all limited jurisdiction courts' systems, should allow for the petitioner to electronically track the progress of the petition for a protection order. Notification may be provided by text messaging or email, and should provide reminders of court appearances and alert the petitioner when the following occur: (i) The petition has been processed and is under review by a judicial officer; (ii) the order has been signed; (iii) the order has been transmitted to law enforcement for entry into the Washington crime information center system; (iv) proof of service upon the respondent has been filed with the court or clerk; (v) a receipt for the surrender of firearms has been filed with the court or clerk; and (vi) the respondent has filed a motion for the release of surrendered firearms. Respondents, once served, should be able to sign up for similar electronic notification. Petitioners and respondents should not be charged for electronic notification.(2) The petition must be accompanied by a confidential document to be used by the courts and law enforcement to fully identify the parties and serve the respondent. This record will be exempt from public disclosure at all times, and restricted access to this form is governed by general rule 22 provisions governing access to the confidential information form. The petitioner is required to fill out the confidential party information form to the petitioner's fullest ability. The respondent should be provided a blank confidential party information form at the time of service, and when the respondent first appears, the respondent must confirm with the court the respondent's identifying and current contact information, including electronic means of contact, and file this with the court.(3) A petition must be accompanied by a declaration signed under penalty of perjury stating the specific facts and circumstances for which relief is sought. Parties, attorneys, and witnesses may electronically sign sworn statements in all filings.(4) The petitioner and the respondent must disclose the existence of any other litigation or of any other restraining, protection, or no-contact orders between the parties, to the extent that such information is known by the petitioner and the respondent. To the extent possible, the court shall take judicial notice of any existing restraining, protection, or no-contact orders between the parties before entering a protection order. The court shall not include provisions in a protection order that would allow the respondent to engage in conduct that is prohibited by another restraining, protection, or no-contact order between the parties that was entered in a different proceeding. The obligation to disclose the existence of any other litigation includes, but is not limited to, the existence of any other litigation concerning the custody or residential placement of a child of the parties as set forth in RCW 26.27.281. The court administrator shall verify for the court the terms of any existing protection order governing the parties.(5) The petition may be made regardless of whether or not there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action between the parties, except in cases where the court has realigned the parties in accordance with RCW 7.105.210.(6) Relief under this chapter must not be denied or delayed on the grounds that the relief is available in another action. The court shall not defer acting on a petition for a protection order nor grant a petitioner less than the full relief that the petitioner is otherwise entitled to under this chapter because there is, or could be, another proceeding involving the parties including, but not limited to, any potential or pending family law matter or criminal matter.(7) A person's right to petition for relief under this chapter is not affected by the person leaving his or her residence or household.(8) A petitioner is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any proceeding for a protection order.(9)(a) No fees for service of process may be charged by a court or any public agency to petitioners seeking relief under this chapter. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, courts may not charge petitioners any fees or surcharges the payment of which is a condition precedent to the petitioner's ability to secure access to relief under this chapter. Petitioners shall be provided the necessary number of certified copies, forms, and instructional brochures free of charge, including a copy of the service packet that consists of all documents that are being served on the respondent. A respondent who is served electronically with a protection order shall be provided a certified copy of the order free of charge upon request.(b) A filing fee may be charged for a petition for an antiharassment protection order except as follows:(i) No filing fee may be charged to a petitioner seeking an antiharassment protection order against a person who has engaged in acts of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, a hate crime under RCW 9A.36.080(1)(c), or a single act of violence or threat of violence under RCW 7.105.010(((36)))(38)(b), or from a person who has engaged in nonconsensual sexual conduct or penetration or conduct that would constitute a sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.128, or from a person who is a family or household member or intimate partner who has engaged in conduct that would constitute domestic violence; and(ii) The court shall waive the filing fee if the court determines the petitioner is not able to pay the costs of filing.(10) If the petition states that disclosure of the petitioner's address or other identifying location information would risk harm to the petitioner or any member of the petitioner's family or household, that address may be omitted from all documents filed with the court. If the petitioner has not disclosed an address under this subsection, the petitioner shall designate an alternative address or email address at which the respondent may serve the petitioner.(11) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, or as provided through alternative sources including, but not limited to, grants, local funding, or pro bono means, if the court deems it necessary, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem for a petitioner or a respondent who is under 18 years of age and who is not represented by counsel. If a guardian ad litem is appointed by the court for either or both parties, neither the petitioner nor the respondent shall be required by the court to pay any costs associated with the appointment.(12) If a petitioner has requested an ex parte temporary protection order, because these are often emergent situations, the court shall prioritize review, either entering an order without a hearing or scheduling and holding an ex parte hearing in person, by telephone, by video, or by other electronic means on the day the petition is filed if possible. Otherwise, it must be heard no later than the following judicial day. The clerk shall ensure that the request for an ex parte temporary protection order is presented timely to a judicial officer, and signed orders will be returned promptly to the clerk for entry and to the petitioner as specified in this section.(13) Courts shall not require a petitioner to file duplicative forms.(14) The Indian child welfare act applies in the following manner.(a) In a proceeding under this chapter where the petitioner seeks to protect a minor and the petitioner is not the minor's parent as defined by RCW 13.38.040, the petition must contain a statement alleging whether the minor is or may be an Indian child as defined in RCW 13.38.040. If the minor is an Indian child, chapter 13.38 RCW and the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq., shall apply. A party should allege in the petition if these laws have been satisfied in a prior proceeding and identify the proceeding.(b) Every order entered in any proceeding under this chapter where the petitioner is not a parent of the minor or minors protected by the order must contain a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does or does not apply, or if there is insufficient information to make a determination, the court must make a finding that a determination must be made before a full protection order may be entered. If there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, but the court does not have sufficient evidence to determine that the child is or is not an Indian child, 25 C.F.R. Sec. 23.107(b) applies. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does apply, the order must also contain a finding that all notice, evidentiary requirements, and placement preferences under the federal Indian child welfare act and chapter 13.38 RCW have been satisfied, or a finding that removal or placement of the child is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child pursuant to 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1922 and RCW 13.38.140. Where there is a finding that the federal Indian child welfare act or chapter 13.38 RCW does not apply, the order must also contain a finding as to why there is no reason to know the child may be an Indian child.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 25. Section 18 of this act expires January 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 26. Section 19 of this act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---